lt-LT: Kamuolio šerdies konstrukcija: Kamštis ir guma; Tuščiavidurė; Hibridinis polimeras; Pilnavidurė; Kita
tr: Top çekirdeği yapısı: Mantar ve kauçuk; İçi boş; Hibrit polimer; Dolu; Diğer
sl-SI: Konstrukcije sredice žoge: Pluta in guma; Votlo; Hibridni polimer; Polno; Drugo
zh-CN: 球芯结构: 软木和橡胶; 中空; 混合聚合物; 实心; 其他
ko: 볼 코어 구조: 코르크 및 고무; 중공형; 하이브리드 폴리머; 솔리드; 기타
nb: Kjernekonstruksjon i kule/ball: Kork og gummi; Hul; Hybridpolymer; Kompakt; Annet
hr-HR: Konstrukcija jezgre lopte: Pluto i guma; Šuplje; Hibridni polimer; Puno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Estrutura do núcleo da bola: Cortiça e borracha; Oca; Polímero híbrido; Sólida; Outro
fi: Pallon ytimen rakenne: Korkki ja kumi; Ontto; Hybridipolymeeri; Umpinainen; Muu
ru: Конструкция сердцевины мяча: Пробка и резина; Полый; Гибридный полимер; Сплошной; Другое
fr: Construction à noyau sphérique: Liège et caoutchouc; Creux; Polymère hybride; Plein; Autre
ro-RO: Construcția miezului mingii: Plută și cauciuc; Cu interior gol; Polimer hibrid; Plin; Altele
hu: Labdamag felépítése: Parafa és gumi; Üreges; Hibrid polimer; Tömör; Egyéb
el: Κατασκευή πυρήνα μπάλας: Φελλός και καουτσούκ; Κούφιος; Υβριδικό πολυμερές; Συμπαγής; Άλλο
th: โครงสร้างแกนกลางลูกบอล: ไม้ก๊อกและยาง; กลวง; ไฮบริดโพลิเมอร์; ทึบ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Конструкция на ядрото на топката: Корк и гума; Куха; Хибриден полимер; Плътна; Друго
nl: Interne balopbouw: Kurk en rubber; Hol; Hybride polymeer; Massief; Overig
de: Innenmaterial des Ball: Kork und Gummi; Hohl; Hybridpolymer; Massiv; Sonstige
ja: ボールコア構造: コルク＆ラバー; 中空; ハイブリッドポリマー; ソリッド; その他
zh-TW: 球芯結構: 軟木與橡膠; 中空; 混合聚合物; 實心; 其他
pl: Konstrukcja rdzenia piłki: Korek i guma; Pusta w środku; Polimer hybrydowy; Pełna; Inne
sk-SK: Konštrukcia jadra lopty: Korok a guma; Duté; Hybridný polymér; Pevné; Iná
da: Kuglekernekonstruktion: Kork og gummi; Hul; Hybridpolymer; Massiv; Andet
pt-PT: Construção do núcleo da bola: Cortiça e borracha; Oco; Polímero híbrido; Sólido; Outro
it: Costruzione del nucleo del pallone: Sughero e gomma; Cavo; Polimero ibrido; Solido; Altro
sv: Kulkärnans konstruktion: Kork och gummi; Ihålig; Hybridpolymer; Massiv; Övrigt
en: Ball core construction: Cork and rubber; Hollow; Hybrid polymer; Solid; Other
cs: Provedení jádra míče: Korek a guma; Duté; Hybridní polymer; Plné; Jiné
vi: Cấu trúc lõi bóng: Nút bần và cao su; Rỗng; Polymer lai; Đặc; Khác
es: Construcción del núcleo de la bola: Corcho y goma; Hueco; Polímero híbrido; Sólido; Otro